Wyoming, session 2026, HB0042.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-5-1101 is amended to read:

31-5-1101. Duty to stop vehicle where accident
involves death or personal injuries; penalties.

HB0042

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0268
(a) The driver of any vehicle knowingly involved in
an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person
shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the
accident or as close thereto as possible but shall then
forthwith return to and in every event shall remain at the
scene of the accident until he has fulfilled the
requirements of W.S. 31-5-1103. Every stop shall be made
without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

(b) Any person failing to stop or to comply with
subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be:
imprisoned

(i) Guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, fined a fine
not more than to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00),
or both, if the accident resulted in bodily injury as
defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(i);

(ii) Guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine not
to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if
HB0042

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0268
the accident resulted in death or serious bodily injury as
defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(x).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0042